src-fst-phonology.twolc.md
* *kä^RVvnâst^WG^VBACK^RLEN>*
* *kaavnâst000>*

* *le^RVkk4â^WG^RLEN>*
* *lee0hâ00>*

* *he^RVrkkib^WG^RLENttáá*
* *heer0kib00ttáá*

* *nju^RVne^SV^WG^RLEN^SLEN>st*
* *njuunee000>st*

**RULE: Root vowel o5:u ** = 
puhtii

**RULE: Root vowel ä:ää lenghtening and diphthongisation e:iä** = special rule, for avoiding conflict spä%^RVi4lih%^WG%^RLEN, 
1) vä%^RVr%^RCid
2)
3)já%^RVhhá%^SVl%^ÁI%^WG%^RLEN>
4)
5) e:iä, ergi -> iärgán
6) too much here?
7) čevžuin čiävžui če%^RVvžui4%^WG>

* *pe^RVi4vi^EA^WG>žân*
* *piäivá00>žân*

* *pe^RVi4vi^EA^CLEN>i5n*
* *piäivá00>in*

**RULE: Root vowel o lengthening** =  alge : oolgijn 
1)
2)
3)
5) toovâd moonnum
poovtám  o5o

* *a^RVlge^WG^RLEN>id*
* *oolgi00>jd*

**RULE: Root vowel u lengthening with vowel change before suffix i** =  alge : oolgijn 
1)
2)
3)
4) puuvtijd
5) juuttu>m
5) juuttâl

* *mu^RVšti^WG^VHIGH^RLEN>j*
* *muušti000>j*
* *lo^RVh^RCá^WG^VHIGH^RLEN>im*
* *luuv0á000>im*
* *ku^RVlgâ^WG^VHIGH^RLEN>i3*
* *kuulgâ000>i*
* *hu^RVm^RCo^SVb^RVSH>ist*
* *hu0m0o0b0>ist*
* *hu^RVm^RCo^SVb^WG^RVSH^SVSH>ân*
* *hu0m0o0b000>ân*

### First syllable vowel change rules

All instances of the same vowel alternation are in the same rule.

a rules

**RULE: Root vowel change a:o before suffix i and for contract verbs** =  alge : olgijn 
contr 
contr 

**RULE: Root vowel o:u for contract verbs and Root vowel change o:u before suffix i** 
juttuum
?
alge : olgijn, remove đ because of inf.
XXX ny
1) poccuu puásui  
([%^RLEN:|%^RVSH:]) (%^SLEN:) [%>|.#.] 5) jutâlâm juuttâl

* *tohhi2>đ*
* *tuhhi>đ*
* *lo^RVh^RCá^WG^VHIGH^RLEN>im*
* *luuv0á000>im*

* *ho^RVrtte*
* *hu0rttijn*

### ä rules

**RULE: Monophthongisation rule iä:ee 1** =  
1)
2)viäskár veeskir iäbbár eebir 
estuđ

**RULE: iä:e rule 1 and second syllable Fleeting vowel before suffix        ** =  Note: many rules in one
1)  i:0 for iđ C verbs 
2)  i:0 for uđ C verbs
melluu
4) cokkiitt%^CLEN%^RLEN%^SLEN%>mân

**RULE: iä:e and iä:ee rule 2 and Diphthongisation i5ä to ie** =  
estuđ kiä5ptu2 > kieptuđ

* *siämmu2>đ>*
* *s0emmu>đ>*

**RULE: Different rules for ä:a, first vowel (or only vowel)** =  čääci:čassijn, läbži:labžijn lään^RCi%>id
OBS ^EA -> VHIGH?

* *njääh^RCi^WG^VBACK>i3*
* *njaav0i00>i*

* *kä^RVvnâ^WG^VBACK#škyett4*
* *ka0vnâ00#škye0t*

**RULE: ää to aa, second vowel** =  á:o in pairs like kuátij -> koođij, säämi -> saamij čäällu%^VBACK%>m lään^RCi%>id
viäskár:veeskir viäskár%^ÁI%^WG%^RLEN
paaccim čaallum

* *čäähâ^WG^VBACK^RVSH#škyett4*
* *čaavâ000#škye0t*

**RULE: ää to áá and á0 in Illative and Sg3** =  ... for säämi > sáámán
:á  XXX
sámásis
njálmásis

:á

* *sääm^RCi^EA>nmake*
* *sáám0á0>n*

**RULE: äRV to áá in Illative and Sg3** =  ... for täsni -> táásnán
čevžuin čiävžui RLEN

* *hä^RVvdi^EA^WG^RLEN>š*
* *háávdá000>š*

* *tä^RVsni^EA^CSH^RLEN>n*
* *táásná000>n*

**RULE: Vowel lengthening äRV to aa ** =  äigi aaigijd
kä%^RVlgâ%^WG%^VBACK%^RLEN%>m

* *sälkki2>đ>*
* *salkki>đ>*
* *sääm^RCi^WG>in*
* *saam0i0>jn*
* *sääm^RCi^WG>id*
* *saam0i0>jd*
* *stäävi2>đ>*
* *staavi>đ>*
* *stäävi2>j>*
* *staavi>j>*
* *stäävi2>i3>*
* *staavi>i>*
* *stäävi2>jeh>*
* *stääve>jeh>*
* *kä^RVvnâst^WG^VBACK^RLEN^SLEN>*
* *kaavnâst0000>*

#### á rules

**RULE: Root vowel change for á to ä with i in second syllable** =  päävir , já%^RVhhá%^SVl%^ÁI%^WG%^RLEN>

* *páápp4ár^ÁI^WG^RLEN*
* *pää0vir000*

**RULE: Root and stem vowel á:a for verbs** 

* *pá^RVkk4u^VBACK>m>*
* *pa0kku0>m>*

* *pá^RVkk4u^WG^RLEN>im>*
* *páá0hu00>im>*

### á and uá rules

**RULE: Monophthongisation rule uá:o0 part 2: Vowel shortening for uá ** =  for uábbi -> obbijn  čuál%^RCi%^WG%>in tuái4jâl%^CSH%^VBACK%^RVSH%>âm
sopâvetteđ tojâdâm
uáinu

**RULE: Monophthongisation rule u:o and root vowel change u:o, special rule for olmooš and contract verbs** = 
ulmu : olmooš, olmožin, carefully with only initial vowel
oođđim            
sopâvetteđ tojâdâm
puáhháá : poovij ! XXX

* *uái4nu2>đ*
* *o0inu>đ*

* *tuállâ^WG^VBACK^RVSH#škyett4*
* *to00lâ000#škye0t*

**RULE: Diphthong rule uá:uo and uá:oo, part 2** =  
uá > uo
uá > uo

**RULE: Root vowel aa:áá in C-stems with stemvowel u, part 1** =  ahhu:áhu

**RULE: Root vowel aa:áá in C-stems with stemvowel u, part 2** =  ahhu:ááhu

**RULE: Diphthongisation e to iä, part 1 ** =   
ergi:iärgán eeč^RCi^EA^CLEN^RVSH>s
čevžuin čiävžui če%^RVvžui4%^WG>
peeh%^RCá%^VHIGH> peeh%^RC 
piävu>s piähho>on piäváččii not meendu
veerrá%^EA%^CSH>
SV: mánuttep : mánuttiäpán

* *ce^RVlkk4u2^CLEN^VHIGH^RVSH>o*
* *ciälkko000>o*

* *eellá^CSH^VHIGH>mušš^FCD*
* *iä0lá00>muš00*

**RULE: ie to iä in Illative and Sg3** =  kiem´ni -> kiämnán, veerdi : viärdán peerru2%^CLEN%^VHIGH%^RVSH%>o
čevžuin čiävžui
piähhoo
eellá%^CSH%^VHIGH
PrfPrc Err/Orth

**RULE: Diphthongisation uo:uá** =   

**RULE: ye to uá and uo, part 1** =  Part 1 of ye to uá for kyeli : kuálán  
syej%^RCi%^RVSH%^CLEN%>in
[i|Cns]; ryettâ^WG^VBACK^RLEN>m

* *ryettâ^WG#škyett4*
* *ruo0tâ0#škye0t*

**RULE: e to á in ye to uá, part 2 and Stem vowel e to á for other root vowel** =  Part 2 of ye to uá for kyeli : kuálán
*ryetáim:
*ryetáim:

* *mo^RVkk4e^SV^EA^WG^CLEN^SLEN*
* *mo0hháá0000*

* *kyel^RCi3^EA^CLEN>m*
* *kuállá00>m*

**RULE: ye to uo, part 2** =  Part 2 of ye to uá for kyeli : kuolijn

* *lyei4kk4â^WG^VBACK^RLEN#škyett4*
* *luoi0hâ000#škye0t*

**RULE: uá to ye and uo to ye, part 1** =  Part 1 luámmán : lyeme čuággás%^ÁI%^WG%^RLEN%>

* *vuolle^CLEN>en*
* *vyelle0>en*

**RULE: uá to ye, part 2** =  Part 2 luámmán : lyeme

**RULE: uo to ye, part 2** =  vyelleen, vyeleem,vyelih

### Second syllable rules

**RULE: Second syllable vowel change á to e or i in 3syll stems** = puttás- > putes, triggers are ^ÁE and ^ÁI já%^RVhhá%^SVl%^ÁI%^WG%^RLEN%> pu5árrás%^ÁI%^WG%>umos

*Test:*
* *puttás^ÁE^WG>*
* *pu0tes00>*

**RULE: Stemvowel shortening  áá and aa to e or i in 3syll** = puttás- > putes, triggers are ^ÁE and ^ÁI

*Tests:*
* *nahha^SVr^ÁE^WG^RLEN>*
* *na0ve0r000>*
* *nahha^SVr^ÁE^WG^RLEN*
* *na0ve0r000*

**RULE: Stem vowel e to a for a root vowel.** =  alge to aalgan

*Tests:*
* *a^RVlge^SV^EA^SLEN>š*
* *a0lgaa00>š*
* *a^RVlge^SV^EA^SLEN*
* *a0lgaa00*
* *a^RVlge^EA^CSH^RLEN>n*
* *aalga000>n*
* *va^RVh^RCe^SV^EA^CLEN^SLEN>m*
* *va0hhaa000>m*

**RULE: Stem vowel i to á for other root vowel.** =  e.g. säämi > Ill sáámán 
SV uábbám iännásis

**RULE: Stem vowel i to â for other root vowel, as a common error.** =  e.g. säämi > Ill Err/Orth sáámân 

**RULE: Stem vowel i to e in front of j** =  

**RULE: Stem vowel â to a in Pl Nom -h** =  silbâ to siilbah  %^WG%^RLEN%>hlove%>h

* *so^RVllâ^WG^RLEN>h*
* *soo0la00>h*

**RULE: Stem vowel â to á change before i** = sollâ to sooláid 

* *so^RVllâ^WG^RLEN^SVLOW>in*
* *soo0lá000>in*

**RULE: Stem vowel i3:0** = 

**RULE: Stem vowel u:o change before suffix** =  
1) olmooš, olmožin
2) 

**RULE: Stem vowel u2:o change before suffix** =  
SVLOW together with u?

* *uáinu>o*
* *uáino>o*

**RULE: Second vowel shortening** = eemeed : emedân, savvoon : savo 
eemeed : emedân sai4joos

**Tests**
* *kulluutt^SVSH>*
* *kull0u0t0>*
* *eemeed^CSH^SVSH>ân*
* *e0m0ed00>ân*
* *kappeer^CSH^SVSH>ân*
* *ka0p0er00>ân*

* *feeri2>i3tt^SVSH*
* *feer0>itt0*

**RULE: Stem vowel:0 in front of â** = aiguu:aaigâ

**RULE: Stem â deleting** = kandâ:kandii ... built without ^FVD (sigh)

* *če^RVrdâi^WG>ih*
* *če0rd0i0>ih*

* *če^RVrdâi^WG>j*
* *če0rd0i0>j*

* *če^RVrdâi^WG>id*
* *če0rd0i0>jd*

**RULE: Word final vowel deletion** = This unfortunately both for word and stem vowel deletion just now.

*Tests:*
* *sollâ^FVD>ii*
* *soll00>ii*

* *a^RVlgâ^FVD^WG^CLENi>*
* *a0lg0000i>i*

* *a^RVlgâi^FVD^WG^CLEN>i5*
* *a0lg0i000>i*

### Suffix vowel rules

**RULE: Suffix vowel lengthening** = long á in kissáást, nuorâ : nuorááin, hyeni:hyeneest

**Tests**
* *ki^RVssá^SV^WG^CLEN^SLEN>st*
* *ki0ssáá000>st*
* *mi^RVllo^SV^WG^CLEN^SLEN>st*
* *mi0lloo000>st*
* *huksi^SVm^SLEN>ist*
* *huksiim0>ist*
* *táál^RCu^SV^WG^RVSH^SLEN^SVLOW>st*
* *táál0oo0000>st*

**RULE: Suffix i5:j for lexicon APINA** = salijn

**RULE: Suffix i5:0 for loanwords** = *timotein, Charlien*, not *timoteiin, Chariliein*, change (invariant) i5 to something else?

**RULE: Suffix i:j for i and e-stems** =  

**RULE: Vowel copy in suffix** =  for imperative Sg3, at least

### Suffix consonant rules

**RULE: Adjective illative in -vân after u** =  

**RULE: Shortening u for vân illative** =  

* *hárdu2>utt^SVSH*
* *hárd0>utt0*

**RULE: Potential vowel shortening for contract verbs** =  -áážep becomes -áš etc.

**RULE: Insertion of pleonastic hyphen** = for compounding of two vowels *stovli-ijâ*

*Tests:*
* *skä^RVi4nâ^VBACK>đ*
* *ska0inâ0>đ*
* *hu^RVm^RCo^SVb^WG^RLEN^SLEN^RLEN^SLEN*
* *huum0oob00000*

* * *

<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [src/fst/phonology.twolc](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-smn/blob/main/src/fst/phonology.twolc)</small>

---
